Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB696.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1207(19) and 1210(a)(2) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1207. Regulatory authority of board.The board shall have the power and its duties shall be to:* * *(19) Authorize an employee of the board to approve, deny or condition a request to decrease the number of slot machines in operation at a licensed facility. An employee may not approve a requested decrease in the number of slot machines under this paragraph if the requested decrease exceeds 2% of the total number of slot machines in operation at a licensed facility. [Except as provided under paragraph (20), at no time shall the number of slot machines in 12345678910111213141516171819 operation at a Category 1 or Category 2 licensed facility be less than 1,500 or less than 250 slot machines at a Category 3 licensed facility.]* * *§ 1210. Number of slot machines.(a) Initial complement.--Except as provided for Category 3 slot machine licensees under section 1305 (relating to Category 3 slot machine license) or a Category 4 slot machine licensee under section 1305.1 (relating to Category 4 slot machine license), the following apply:* * *[(2) Each slot machine licensee shall be required to operate and make available to play a minimum of 1,500 slot machines at its licensed facility within one year of the issuance by the board of a slot machine license to the slot machine licensee. The board, upon application and for good cause shown, may grant an extension for an additional period ending on the later of 36 months from the end of the initial one-year period or December 31, 2012.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0696PN0712 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021